Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 19. Dredging Sand and Gravel.

§ 62.1-190.
Dredging of sand or gravel prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person or corporation to dredge, dig or otherwise remove and carry away any part of any deposit of sand or gravel, or mixture of sand and gravel from any part of the fastland, or beach or bluff, abutting upon any of the rivers, streams or other waters within the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth, or from any part of the bed of such rivers, streams or other waters between high- and low-watermarks.

In case any such deposit extends uninterruptedly from low watermark out into the bed of such waters, it shall, except as hereinafter provided, be unlawful to dig and carry away any part of such extended deposit lying between such low watermark and the middle line of such waters.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-178; 1968, c. 659.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Larceny, § 8.

§ 62.1-191.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person or corporation violating the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-179; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-192.
Injunction and damages.

Any owner of any such fastland or beach, bluff, or bed of stream, between high- and low-watermark on which any such deposit exists or from which it extends towards the middle line of the water, as aforesaid, may, by appropriate proceedings brought by such owner, have an injunction against any person or corporation removing and carrying away or attempting to remove and carry away any such deposit or extension thereof without authority of the Commonwealth; and may, in such proceeding, or by separate action, recover against such violation of this chapter damages in treble the value of the material removed.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-180; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-193.
Exemptions from chapter.

The prohibitions of this chapter shall not apply to any owner of any fastland, bluff, beach or bed of stream, upon or in front of which such deposits may lie, nor to any person or corporation acting under written permission from, or contract with such owner.

None of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to interfere in any manner with the provisions of any law of this Commonwealth relating to taking fish and oysters.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-181; 1968, c. 659; 1986, c. 145.